Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.245

Registration or licensing prerequisite to suit by employment agency—Action against unregistered or unlicensed employment agency.

(1) No employment agency may bring or maintain a cause of action in any court of this state for compensation for, or seeking equitable relief in regard to, services rendered employers and applicants, unless such agency shall allege and prove that at the time of rendering the services in question, or making the contract therefor, it was registered with the department or the holder of a valid license issued under this chapter.

(2) Any person who shall give consideration of any kind to any employment agency for the performance of employment services in this state when said employment agency shall not be registered with the department or be the holder of a valid license issued under this chapter shall have a cause of action against the employment agency. Any court having jurisdiction may enter judgment therein for treble the amount of such consideration so paid, plus reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

(3) A person performing the services of an employment agency, employment listing service, or employment directory without being registered with the department or holding a valid license shall cease operations or immediately apply for a valid license or register with the department. If the person continues to operate in violation of this chapter the director or the attorney general has a cause of action in any court having jurisdiction for the return of any consideration paid by any person to the agency. The court may enter judgment in the action for treble the amount of the consideration so paid, plus reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

[ 1993 c 499 s 8; 1990 c 70 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 10.]